Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-193
Credential; disciplinary action; partial-birth abortion; violation of Preborn Child Protection Act; director; powers and duties.

(1) If the petition is brought with respect to subdivision (3) of section 38-2021, the director shall make findings as to whether the licensee's conduct was necessary to save the life of a mother whose life was endangered by a physical disorder, physical illness, or physical injury, including a life-endangering physical condition caused by or arising from the pregnancy itself. The director shall have the authority through entry of an order to exercise in his or her discretion any or all of the sanctions authorized under section 38-196, irrespective of the petition.

(2) If the petition is brought with respect to subdivision (5) of section 38-2021, the director shall make findings as to whether the licensee performed or induced an unlawful abortion in violation of section 71-6915. If the director finds such a violation, the director shall enter an order revoking the licensee's credential to practice pursuant to the Uniform Credentialing Act in the State of Nebraska in accordance with subsection (2) of section 38-196 and section 38-1,100.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 93;

Laws 2023, LB574, § 10.